Arkansas, session 2025, SB407.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 2, Chapter 6, is repealed.
2-6-101. Title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Arkansas Catfish
Processor Fair Practices Act of 1987”.

2-6-102. Purpose.
The General Assembly finds that a burden on and an obstruction to
intrastate commerce in the catfish farming industry is caused when payment is
not made for the catfish and that these arrangements are contrary to the
public interest. This chapter is intended to remedy this burden on and
obstruction to intrastate commerce in catfish and to protect the public
interest.

2-6-103. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) [Repealed.]
(2) “Capable of use as human food” means and applies to any
catfish or part or product of any catfish unless it is denatured or otherwise
*CRH136*
03/10/2025 7:13:51 AM CRH136

SB407
identified as required by rules prescribed by the Department of Agriculture
to deter its use as human food, or unless it is naturally inedible by humans;
(3) “Cash sale” means a sale in which the seller does not
expressly extend credit to the buyer;
(4) “Catfish” means any species of the scientific order
Ostariophysida, family Ictaluridae;
(5) “Class A registrant” means any catfish processor who
purchases at least fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) worth of catfish annually
from catfish producers;
(6) “Direct retail sale” means the sale of catfish products
directly to the consumer;
(7) [Repealed.]
(8) “Owner” means a person or a producer that owns an equity
interest, directly or indirectly, in a catfish processor;
(9) “Person” includes any individual, partnership, corporation,
and association, or other legal entity;
(10) “Processor” means any person engaged in handling, storing,
preparing, manufacturing, packing, or holding catfish products;
(11) “Producer” means any person engaged in the business of
producing catfish by any method;
(12) “Product” means any catfish product capable of use as human
food which is made wholly or in part from any catfish or portion thereof; and
(13) “Secured party” means a lender who has a perfected security
interest under the Uniform Commercial Code, § 4-1-101 et seq., in the catfish
being sold.

2-6-104. Administration.
(a) This chapter shall be administered by the Department of
Agriculture.
(b) The department is authorized to promulgate such rules as may be
necessary for the efficient enforcement of this chapter, including the
establishment of reasonable fees for registering with the department.
(c) If necessary to prevent the spread of disease, the State
Veterinarian in consultation with the Secretary of the Department of
Agriculture may issue orders under this subchapter for the:
(1) Isolation or quarantine of infected fish;
03/10/2025 7:13:51 AM CRH136

SB407
(2) Disinfection of premises;
(3) Destruction of incurably-diseased fish; and
(4) Disposal of fish.

2-6-105. Registration and suspension — Exception.
(a)(1) Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, every
catfish processor in the state shall register with the Department of
Agriculture.
(2) Applications for registration as a catfish processor under
this chapter shall be made on forms prescribed by the department.
(3) Every application is to be accompanied by an application fee
of one hundred fifty dollars ($150), a certified financial statement in a
form prescribed by the department, and any further information the department
may by rule require.
(b) The department shall promulgate such rules as necessary to secure
the performance of catfish purchasing obligations.
(c) Whenever, after due notice and hearing, the department finds any
registrant is insolvent or has violated any provisions of this chapter, it
may issue an order suspending the registrant for a reasonable specified
period. The order of suspension shall take effect within five (5) days unless
suspended, modified, or set aside by the department or a court of competent
jurisdiction.
(d) If the department finds any processor is insolvent, is issuing
invalid or insufficient checks, or is causing a breach of contract with the
producer by failure to pay the producer in accordance with the contract, the
department shall issue an order requiring the processor to cease and desist
from purchasing catfish except under such conditions as the department may
prescribe to effectuate the purposes of this chapter.
(e) Those processors whose average annual purchases from catfish
producers do not exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) shall be
exempt from the provisions of this section.

2-6-106. Unlawful practices — Penalties.
(a)(1) With respect to catfish or catfish products, it shall be
unlawful for any processor to engage in or use any unfair, unjustly
discriminatory, or deceptive practice.
03/10/2025 7:13:51 AM CRH136

SB407
(2) If any person subject to this chapter violates any of the
provisions of this chapter or of any order of the Department of Agriculture
under this chapter relating to the purchase, sale, or handling of catfish, he
or she shall be liable to the person injured for the full amount of damages
sustained in consequence of the violation.
(b) This liability may be enforced either by complaint to the
department or by suit in any circuit court of competent jurisdiction. This
section shall not in any way abridge or alter the remedies now existing at
common law or by statute, but the provisions of this section are in addition
to those remedies.
(c) The department is authorized to apply for and the court is
authorized to grant a temporary or permanent injunction restraining any
person from violating or continuing to violate any of the provisions of this
chapter or any rule promulgated under this chapter, notwithstanding the
existence of other remedies at law. The injunction shall be issued without
bond.
(d) The department may assess civil penalties against any Class A
registrant as follows:
(1) Not more than fifty dollars ($50.00) for each day payment to
the producer is late under § 2-6-107(a)(2);
(2) Not more than one hundred dollars ($100) for each day
payment to the producer is late under the contract between the registrant and
the producer; and
(3) In instances where the registrant has paid a producer with
an invalid or insufficient check, not more than two hundred dollars ($200)
for each day the check is invalid or insufficiently funded.
(e) Civil penalties collected under this chapter shall be deposited
into the Livestock and Poultry Special Revenue Fund.

2-6-107. Purchase methods — Delays.
(a) Each processor shall use one (1) of the following methods to
purchase catfish products:
(1) The processor may deliver to the producer or his or her
authorized representative and any secured parties the full amount of the
purchase price on the same day the catfish product is purchased and
possession is transferred;
03/10/2025 7:13:51 AM CRH136

SB407
(2)(A) Before the close of the fourteenth calendar day following
the purchase of the catfish products and transfer or possession of the
catfish products, the processor may deliver to the producer or his or her
authorized representative and any secured parties the full amount of the
purchase price.
(B) If the producer or his or her authorized
representative or secured parties are not present to receive payment at the
point of transfer or possession, as provided in subdivision (a)(1) of this
section, the processor shall wire transfer funds or place a check in the
United States mail for the full amount of the purchase price, properly
addressed to the producer and any secured parties, within the time limits
specified in this subsection. This action shall be deemed in compliance with
the requirement for prompt payment under this subdivision (a)(2); or
(3) The parties to the purchase and sale of catfish products may
expressly agree in writing before the purchase or sale to effect payment in a
manner other than that required in subdivision (a)(1) or (2) of this section
if the manner of payment does not interfere with the rights of secured
parties. Any agreement shall be disclosed in the records of any producer
selling the catfish and in the processors' records and on the accounts or
other documents issued by the processors relating to the transaction.
(b)(1) Regardless of the method elected under subdivision (a)(2) of
this section to purchase catfish products, a Class A registrant, before the
transaction, shall be required to:
(A) Be bonded in the amount of two hundred fifty thousand
dollars ($250,000) or in an amount which may be determined by the Department
of Agriculture;
(B) Post a security bond in the amount of two hundred
fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) or in an amount which may be determined by
the department; or
(C) Provide cash security, letters of credit, and such
other evidences of security as shall be authorized by the department.
(2) However, if a Class A registrant purchases catfish solely
and exclusively from producers that are also the owners of the processor,
then the Class A registrant is exempt from the bonding or security
requirements imposed under subdivision (b)(1) of this section.
(c) Any delay or attempt to delay, by a processor purchasing catfish
03/10/2025 7:13:51 AM CRH136

SB407
products, the collection of funds as provided in this chapter or otherwise
for the purpose of or resulting in extending the normal period of payment for
the catfish shall be considered an unfair practice in violation of this
chapter.
(d)(1) At the time catfish are delivered to a processor and unloaded
from a live-haul truck, the processor shall weigh the catfish using a device
that is of a type suitable for the weighing of catfish.
(2) Deductions for trash fish, turtles, and other foreign
material except water shall be determined by a separate weighing of the same.
(3) There shall be no water tare nor deductions made for water
in weighing baskets.
(4) Processors are responsible for draining water from weighing
baskets.
(e)(1) Scales used to weigh catfish and foreign material under this
section must be capable of electronically printing a ticket that provides an
exact duplicate of the weight indicated.
(2) A copy of the ticket shall be provided to the producer at
the time of weighing.
(3) The ticket shall also contain the following:
(A) The name and address of the processor;
(B) The name of the owner of the catfish being weighed;
(C) The date the catfish are weighed;
(D) The signature of the individual who weighs the
catfish; and
(E) Any additional information as the department deems
necessary for the lawful and accurate recording of the weight of the catfish.
(f) Processors who process less than seventeen thousand five hundred
pounds (17,500 lbs.) of catfish per week are not required to use the
electronic printing scales otherwise required by this section.
(g) The department shall be responsible for the enforcement of this
section, and its agents shall perform periodic inspections of processing
plants to ensure that the provisions of this section are being carried out
and that all deductions for foreign material are legitimate and fair to the
producer.

2-6-109. Receivership — Petition — Assets.
03/10/2025 7:13:51 AM CRH136

SB407
(a) The Secretary of the Department of Agriculture or his or her
designee in his or her discretion may, following a suspension of a Class A
registrant as provided in this chapter, file a verified petition in the
proper court requesting that the secretary be appointed as a receiver to take
custody of catfish in the registrant's facility and to provide for the
disposition of those assets in the manner provided in this chapter and under
the supervision of the court.
(b) The petition shall be filed in the county in which the registrant
is located. The proper court shall appoint the secretary as receiver.
(c) Upon the filing of the petition, the court shall issue ex parte
such temporary orders as may be necessary to preserve or protect the assets
in receivership, or the value thereof, and the rights of producers, until a
plan of disposition is approved.

2-6-110. Receivership — Plan for disposition of catfish.
A petition filed by the Secretary of the Department of Agriculture
under § 2-6-109 shall be accompanied by the secretary's plan for disposition
of the processed catfish. The plan may provide for the pro rata delivery of
part or all of the processed catfish to producers holding weigh tickets, or
may provide for the sale under the supervision of the secretary of part or
all of the processed catfish for the benefit of those producers, or may
provide for any combination thereof, as the secretary in his or her
discretion determines to be necessary to minimize losses.

2-6-111. Receivership — Hearings on plan — Notice — Service.
(a) When a petition is filed by the Secretary of the Department of
Agriculture or his or her designee under § 2-6-109 the clerk of court shall
set a date for hearing on the secretary's proposed plan of disposition at a
time not less than ten (10) nor more than fifteen (15) calendar days after
the date the petition is filed.
(b) Copies of the petition, the notice of hearing, and the secretary's
plan of disposition shall be served upon the Class A registrant and upon the
surety company issuing the Class A registrant's bond in the manner required
for service of an original notice.
(c) A delay in effecting service upon the Class A registrant or surety
shall not be cause for denying the appointment of a receiver and shall not be
03/10/2025 7:13:51 AM CRH136

SB407
grounds for invalidating any action or proceeding in connection therewith.

2-6-112. Receivership — Notification to weigh ticket holders.
(a) The Secretary of the Department of Agriculture shall cause a copy
of each of the documents served upon the Class A registrant under § 2-6-111
to be mailed by ordinary mail to every person holding a weigh ticket issued
by the Class A registrant, as determined by the records of the Class A
registrant or the records of the secretary.
(b) The failure of any person referred to in this section to receive
the required notification shall not invalidate the proceedings on the
petition for the appointment of a receiver or any portion thereof.
(c) Persons referred to in this section are not parties to the action
unless admitted by the court upon application therefor.

2-6-113. Receivership — Publication of notification of receiver's
appointment.
When appointed as a receiver under this chapter the Secretary of the
Department of Agriculture shall cause notification of the appointment to be
published once each week for two (2) consecutive weeks in a newspaper of
general circulation in each of the counties in which the Class A registrant
maintains a business location, and in a newspaper of general circulation in
this state.

2-6-114. Receivership — Designee — Duties of secretary.
The Secretary of the Department of Agriculture may designate an
employee to appear on behalf of the secretary in any proceedings before the
court with respect to the receivership, and to exercise the functions of the
secretary as receiver, except that the secretary shall determine whether or
not to petition for the appointment as receiver, shall approve the proposed
plan for disposition of processed catfish, shall approve the proposed plan
for distribution of any cash proceeds, and shall approve the proposed final
report.

2-6-115. Receivership — Applicability of administrative procedures.
The actions of the Secretary of the Department of Agriculture in
connection with petitioning for appointment as a receiver, and all actions
03/10/2025 7:13:51 AM CRH136

SB407
under such appointment, shall not be subject to the provisions of the
Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.

2-6-116. Receivership — Sureties.
When the Secretary of the Department of Agriculture or his or her
designee is appointed as receiver under this chapter, the surety on the bond
of the Class A registrant shall be joined as a party defendant by the
secretary. If required by the court, the surety shall pay the bond proceeds,
or so much thereof as the court finds necessary, into the court, and when so
paid the surety shall be absolutely discharged from any further liability
under the bond to the extent of the payment.

2-6-117. Receivership — Notice of claims filing deadline.
(a) When appointed as receiver under this chapter, the Secretary of
the Department of Agriculture or his or her designee is authorized to give
notice in the manner specified by the court to persons holding weigh tickets
issued by the Class A registrant to file their claims within sixty (60)
calendar days after the date of appointment.
(b) Failure to timely file a claim shall defeat the claim with respect
to the surety bond and any catfish, or proceeds from the sale of catfish,
except to the extent of any excess remaining after all timely claims are paid
in full.

2-6-118. Receivership — Sale of processed catfish — Merchandiser.
(a) When the court approves the sale of processed catfish the
Secretary of the Department of Agriculture shall employ a merchandiser to
effect the sale of those commodities.
(b) A person employed as a merchandiser must meet the following
requirements:
(1) The person shall be experienced or knowledgeable in the
operation of processors registered under this chapter, and if the person has
ever held a registration certificate issued under this chapter, the person
shall never have had the registration suspended;
(2) The person shall be experienced or knowledgeable in the
marketing of aquacultural products; and
(3) The person shall not be the holder of a weigh ticket issued
03/10/2025 7:13:51 AM CRH136

SB407
by the Class A registrant and shall not have a claim against the Class A
registrant, whether as a secured or unsecured creditor, and otherwise shall
not have any pecuniary interest in the Class A registrant or the Class A
registrant's business.
(c) The merchandiser shall be entitled to reasonable compensation as
determined by the secretary.
(d) A sale of processed catfish shall be made in a commercially
reasonable manner and under the supervision of the secretary.
(e) The secretary shall have authority to sell the processed catfish,
and provisions of the Uniform Commercial Code, § 4-1-101 et seq., to the
contrary notwithstanding, any processed catfish so sold shall be free of all
liens and other encumbrances.

2-6-119. Receivership — Distribution to producers.
The plan of disposition, as approved by the court, shall provide for
the distribution of the processed catfish, or the proceeds from the sale of
processed catfish or the proceeds from any surety bond, or any combination
thereof, less expenses incurred by the Secretary of the Department of
Agriculture in connection with the receivership, to producers on a pro rata
basis as their interests are determined. Distribution shall be without regard
to any setoff, counterclaim, or charge.

2-6-120. Receivership — Continued operation of business.
The Secretary of the Department of Agriculture or his or her designee
may, with the approval of the court, continue the operation of all or any
part of the business of the Class A registrant on a temporary basis and take
any other course of action or procedure which will serve the interests of the
producers.

2-6-121. Receivership — Reimbursement.
The Secretary of the Department of Agriculture shall be entitled to
reimbursement out of processed catfish or proceeds held in receivership for
all expenses incurred as court costs or in handling and disposing of
processed catfish, and for all other costs directly attributable to the
receivership. The right of reimbursement of the secretary shall be prior to
any claims against the processed catfish or proceeds of sale thereof and
03/10/2025 7:13:51 AM CRH136

SB407
shall constitute a claim against the surety bond of the Class A registrant.

2-6-122. Receivership — Proceeds — Termination.
In the event the approved plan of disposition requires the sale of
processed catfish, or the distribution of proceeds from the surety bond, or
both, the Secretary of the Department of Agriculture or his or her designee
shall submit to the court a proposed plan of distribution of those proceeds.
Upon such notice and hearing as may be required by the court, the court shall
accept or modify the proposed plan. When the plan is approved by the court
and executed by the secretary or his or her designee, the secretary or his or
her designee shall be discharged and the receivership terminated.

2-6-123. Receivership — Final report.
At the termination of the receivership, the Secretary of the Department
of Agriculture shall file a final report containing the details of his or her
actions, together with such additional information as the court may require.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 19-6-301(34)(J), concerning the enumeration
of special revenues as Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission fees and
revenues, is repealed.
(J) Catfish processor civil penalties collected under the
Arkansas Catfish Processor Fair Practices Act of 1987, § 2-6-101 et seq.;

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 19-6-480(a), concerning the Livestock and
Poultry Special Revenue Fund, is amended to read as follows:
(a) The Livestock and Poultry Special Revenue Fund shall consist of
those special revenues as specified in § 19-6-301(33) and (34) and §§ 2-5-
204, and 2-5-206, and 2-6-106 that are not required for support of the
Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Poultry and Egg Grading Program,
there to be used for those purposes as set out by law.






03/10/2025 7:13:51 AM CRH136